Florida, session 2026, HB6015.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section
624.1265, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
624.1265 Nonprofit religious organization exemption;
authority; notice.—
(1) A nonprofit religious organization is not subject to
the requirements of the Florida Insurance Code if the nonprofit
religious organization:
(h) Does not market or sell health plans through agents
licensed by the department under chapter 626.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6015-00